Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.250

Report to judges of supreme court.

Superior judges shall, on or before the first day of November in each year, report in writing to the judges of the supreme court, such defects and omissions in the laws as their experience may suggest.

[ 1890 p 344 s 14; RRS s 11050.]

NOTES:

Annual report to supreme court: State Constitution Art. 4 s 25.